sv: Typ av cricketboll: Skumboll; Hård läderboll; Ingen boll ingår; PVC-boll; Gummiboll; Mjuk tennisboll; Övrigt
de: Typ des Cricketballs: Schaumstoffball; Hartlederball; Kein Ball enthalten; PVC-Ball; Gummiball; Weicher Tennisball; Sonstige
el: Τύπος μπάλας κρίκετ: Μπάλα από αφρώδες υλικό; Σκληρή δερμάτινη μπάλα; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται μπάλα; Μπάλα από PVC; Μπάλα από καουτσούκ; Μαλακή μπάλα τένις; Άλλο
zh-CN: 板球类型: 泡沫球; 硬皮球; 不含球; PVC 球; 橡胶球; 软网球; 其他
nb: Type cricketball: Skumball; Hard lærball; Ingen ball inkludert; PVC-ball; Gummiball; Myk tennisball; Annet
tr: Kriket topu tipi: Köpük top; Sert deri top; Top dahil değil; PVC top; Kauçuk top; Yumuşak tenis topu; Diğer
ja: クリケットボールタイプ: フォームボール; 硬式レザーボール; ボールなし; PVC ボール; ラバーボール; ソフトテニスボール; その他
fi: Krikettipallon tyyppi: Vaahtomuovipallo; Kova nahkapallo; Ei sisällä palloa; PVC-pallo; Kumipallo; Pehmeä tennispallo; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de bola de críquete: Bola de espuma; Bola de couro duro; Nenhuma bola incluída; Bola de PVC; Bola de borracha; Bola de tênis macia; Outro
en: Cricket ball type: Foam ball; Hard leather ball; No ball included; PVC ball; Rubber ball; Soft tennis ball; Other
zh-TW: 板球用球類型: 泡棉球; 硬皮球; 不含球; PVC 球; 橡膠球; 軟式網球; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta kriket žogice: Žogica iz pene; Trda usnjena žogica; Brez priložene žogice; PVC-žogica; Gumijasta žogica; Mehka teniška žogica; Drugo
ru: Тип крикетного мяча: Мяч из пеноматериала; Твердый кожаный мяч; Мяч не входит в комплект; Мяч из ПВХ; Резиновый мяч; Мягкий теннисный мяч; Другое
pt-PT: Tipo de bola de críquete: Bola de espuma; Bola de couro duro; Sem bola incluída; Bola de PVC; Bola de borracha; Bola de ténis macia; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta lopte za kriket: Loptica od pjene; Tvrda kožna loptica; Loptica nije uključena; PVC loptica; Gumena loptica; Mekana teniska loptica; Ostalo
vi: Loại bóng cricket: Bóng xốp; Bóng da cứng; Không bao gồm bóng; Bóng PVC; Bóng cao su; Bóng tennis mềm; Khác
ko: 크리켓 공 유형: 폼 볼; 하드 가죽 볼; 볼 미포함; PVC 볼; 고무 볼; 소프트 테니스 볼; 기타
fr: Type de balle de cricket: Balle en mousse; Balle en cuir dur; Balle non incluse; Balle en PVC; Balle en caoutchouc; Balle de tennis souple; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de minge de cricket: Minge de spumă; Minge din piele dură; Fără minge inclusă; Minge din PVC; Minge din cauciuc; Minge de tenis moale; Altele
da: Cricketboldtype: Skumbold; Hård læderbold; Bold medfølger ikke; PVC-bold; Gummibold; Blød tennisbold; Andet
th: ประเภทลูกคริกเก็ต: ลูกโฟม; ลูกหนังแข็ง; ไม่รวมลูก; ลูก PVC; ลูกยาง; ลูกเทนนิสอ่อน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип топка за крикет: Топка от пяна; Твърда кожена топка; Не е включена топка; PVC топка; Гумена топка; Мека тенис топка; Други
nl: Type cricketbal: Schuimrubberen bal; Harde leren bal; Geen bal inbegrepen; PVC-bal; Rubberen bal; Zachte tennisbal; Overig
sk-SK: Typ kriketovej lopty: Penová loptička; Loptička z tvrdej kože; Bez loptičky; Loptička z PVC; Gumená loptička; Mäkká tenisová loptička; Iné
hu: Krikettlabda típusa: Szivacslabda; Kemény bőrlabda; Nem tartalmaz labdát; PVC-labda; Gumilabda; Puha teniszlabda; Egyéb
cs: Typ kriketového míčku: Pěnový míč; Tvrdý kožený míč; Bez míče; Míč z PVC; Gumový míč; Měkký tenisový míč; Ostatní
pl: Typ piłki do krykieta: Piłka piankowa; Twarda piłka skórzana; Brak piłki w zestawie; Piłka z PVC; Piłka gumowa; Miękka piłka tenisowa; Inne
es: Tipo de bola de críquet: Pelota de espuma; Pelota de cuero duro; No incluye pelota; Pelota de PVC; Pelota de goma; Pelota de tenis blanda; Otro
lt-LT: Kriketo kamuoliuko tipas: Poroloninis kamuoliukas; Kietas odinis kamuoliukas; Kamuoliukas nepridedamas; PVC kamuoliukas; Guminis kamuoliukas; Minkštas teniso kamuoliukas; Kita
it: Tipo di palla da cricket: Palla in schiuma; Palla in cuoio duro; Nessuna palla inclusa; Palla in PVC; Palla di gomma; Pallina da tennis morbida; Altro